Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 49. EDUCATION--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 11. COUNTY SCHOOLS

Art. 2676a. ELECTION OF COUNTY BOARD OF SCHOOL TRUSTEES IN COUNTIES OF 100,000 TO 200,000.

Sec. 1. From and after the effective date of this act in any county in this state having a population of not less than 372,000 and not more than 400,000, the general management and control of the public free schools and high schools in each county unless otherwise provided by law shall be vested in five (5) county school trustees elected from the county, one of whom shall be elected from the county at large by the qualified voters of the county and one from each commissioners precinct by the qualified voters of each commissioners precinct, who shall hold office for a term of two (2) years. The time for such election shall be the first Saturday in April of each year; the order for the election of county school trustees to be made by the County Judge at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of said election, and which order shall designate as voting places or places at which votes are cast for the district trustees of said common and independent school districts, respectively. The election officers appointed to hold the election for district trustees in each of said school districts, respectively, shall hold this election for county school trustees.

Sec. 2. It shall be no valid objection that the voters of a commissioners precinct are required by the operation of this Act to cast their ballots at a polling place outside the commissioners precinct of their residence.

Sec. 3. The Commissioners Court of each county within the scope of Section 1 shall appoint county school trustees to serve until the first regularly scheduled election as provided herein.

Sec. 4. All five (5) county school trustees shall be elected at the first regulary scheduled election. Two (2) of the trustees elected at this election shall serve initial terms of one (1) year. Two (2) or three (3) county school trustees shall thereafter be elected, alternately, at each subsequent election. The county school trustees shall draw lots to determine which two (2) shall serve initial terms of one (1) year.

Sec. 5. All vacancies occurring between elections shall be filled by appointment of the remaining trustees.

Sec. 6. The county judge of each such county shall continue to perform, without additional compensation, duties formerly constituting the role of the county superintendent. The Commissioners Court shall provide funds for secretarial and stenographic assistance to the county judge in performing these duties.

Sec. 7. The county school trustees shall not detach territory from any independent school district in such county and annex such territory to another independent school district without the prior consent of the school trustees of the district from which such territory is being detached as well as the prior consent of the school trustees of the district to which such detached territory is to be annexed.

Acts 1963, 58th Leg., p. 1348, ch. 511.

Sec. 1 amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1833, ch. 542, Sec. 71, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 155, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 186, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 284, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 2676b. ELECTION OF COUNTY-WIDE DISTRICT TRUSTEES IN COUNTIES OF 5,150 TO 5,175.

Sec. 1. This Act applies to a county-wide school district in a county having a population of more than 4,700 and less than 4,900. The Board of Trustees may order that the trustees of the district shall run at large in the county. If the Board orders that its members shall run at large, each position shall be filled by election from the county at large upon expiration of the current term of office.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 456, ch. 233, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1965. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1818, ch. 542, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 571, ch. 237, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 156, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 187, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 285, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 2676c. ELECTION OF COUNTY SCHOOL TRUSTEES IN COUNTIES OF 2,000,000 OR MORE.

Sec. 1. ELECTIONS FOR COUNTY SCHOOL TRUSTEES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. This Act applies to the elections for county school trustees in all counties having a population of 3.3 million or more.

Sec. 2. DATE OF ELECTION. The election for county school trustees shall be held on the first Saturday in April of each odd-numbered year, or on the first Saturday in October of those years as designated by the order of the board of county school trustees.

Sec. 3. ORDER FOR ELECTION. The order for election shall be made by the board of county school trustees at least 30 days before the date the election is to be held, and shall define the voting precincts and name the judges of election.

Sec. 4. NOTICE OF ELECTION. The board of county school trustees shall give notice of an election by posting a notice in each of three public places in the county, one of which shall be at the courthouse door, or by publishing a notice more than 20 days before the date of the election at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, or by both publication and posting.

Sec. 5. ELECTION OFFICERS. So far as possible, the board of county school trustees shall designate the election officers holding the election for local trustees in each of the school districts in the county as the officers to hold the election for county school trustees.

Sec. 6. EXPENSES OF HOLDING AN ELECTION. All expenses of holding an election shall be paid out of the administration funds under the jurisdiction of the board of county school trustees.

Sec. 7. DECLARATION OF ELECTION RESULTS. The officers holding an election shall report the returns of the election to the secretary of the board of county school trustees at his office in the courthouse in the county seat immediately after the election is held. The board of county school trustees shall declare the results of an election within 10 days after the holding of an election.

Sec. 8. CANDIDATE FOR COUNTY SCHOOL TRUSTEE; APPLICATION; ELIGIBILITY. (a) Any person desiring to have his name printed on the ballot as a candidate for the office of county school trustee shall file his written application with the secretary of the board of county school trustees at least 15 days before the date of the election.

(b) No person is eligible to be a candidate unless he is a qualified elector in the State of Texas.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 1291, ch. 595, eff. Aug. 30, 1965. Sec. 1 amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1817, ch. 542, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 571, ch. 237, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Sec. 1 amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 157, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Art. 2685a. EXPENSES OF ADMINISTERING SCHOLASTIC AFFAIRS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. That in each county of this State with a population of not less than thirteen thousand, six hundred (13,600) and not more than thirteen thousand, six hundred fifty (13,650) and in all counties containing a population of not less than fifteen thousand, two hundred (15,200) and not more than fifteen thousand, seven hundred (15,700), as shown by the Federal Census last preceding such action, the county board of trustees is hereby authorized to set aside from the Available School Fund of the county, in accordance with the provisions of the General Law governing the assessment for the support of the county superintendent's office, an amount not to exceed Six Hundred Dollars ($600) to defray the expenses of the county superintendent and the county board of trustees in the administration of the scholastic affairs of the county.

Acts 1935, 44th Leg., p. 437, ch. 175, Sec. 1.

Art. 2685b. COUNTIES OF 5,100 TO 5,200; EXPENSES OF ADMINISTERING SCHOLASTIC AFFAIRS. In each county of this State with a population of not less than five thousand one hundred (5,100) nor more than five thousand two hundred (5,200) as shown by the Federal Census of 1930, the county board of trustees is hereby authorized to set aside from the Available School Fund of the county, in accordance with the provisions of the General Law governing the assessment for the support of the county superintendent's office, an amount not to exceed Six Hundred ($600.00) Dollars per year to defray the expenses of the County Judge serving as ex officio County Superintendent within the county.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 627, Sec. 1.

Art. 2685b-1. COUNTIES OF 5,950 TO 6,050; EXPENSES OF ADMINISTERING SCHOLASTIC AFFAIRS. In each county of this State with a population of not less than five thousand, nine hundred and fifty (5,950) nor more than six thousand and fifty (6,050), as shown by the Federal Census of 1940, the county board of trustees is hereby authorized to set aside from the Available School Fund of the county, in accordance with the provisions of the General Law governing the assessment for the support of the county superintendent's office, an amount not to exceed Nine Hundred Dollars ($900) per year to defray the expenses of the County Judge serving as ex officio county superintendent within the county.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 119, ch. 92, Sec. 1.

Art. 2687b. MEETINGS IN COUNTIES OF 130,000 TO 133,000 POPULATION. In all counties in Texas having a population of not less than one hundred and thirty thousand (130,000) and not more than one hundred and thirty-three thousand (133,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County School Trustees shall hold meetings once each month on the first Monday of each month, or as soon thereafter as practicable, or at such other times when called by the President of the Board of County School Trustees or at the instance of any three (3) members of said Board and the County Superintendent; the meeting place to be at the County Courthouse and in the office of the County Superintendent, or at such other place in the County Courthouse as may be designed by the President of said Board of County School Trustees. Each County School Trustee shall be paid Six Dollars ($6) per day for the time spent in attending said meetings, not exceeding twenty-four (24) days in any one year. Such compensation shall be paid out of the school administration fund of said county by warrants drawn against such fund as the law now provides, after the approval of this Act.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 1820, ch. 40, Sec. 1.

Art. 2687c. MEETINGS IN COUNTIES OF 48,800 TO 50,400; COMPENSATION .

Section 1. In all counties in Texas having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand, eight hundred (48,800) and not more than fifty thousand, four hundred (50,400) inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County School Trustees shall hold meetings once each month on the first Monday in each month, or as soon thereafter as practicable, or at such other time when called by the President of the Board of County School Trustees, or at the instance of any three (3) members of said Board and the County Superintendent, the meeting place to be at the county seat and in the office of the County Superintendent, or at such other place in the county courthouse as may be designated by the President of said Board of County School Trustees. Each County School Trustee shall be paid Five Dollars ($5) per day for the time spent in attending such meeting not to exceed twenty-four (24) days in any one year. Such compensation shall be paid out of the school administration fund of each county by warrants drawn against such fund as the law now provides, after the approval of this Act.

Sec. 2. The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all laws on the subject of this Act when not in conflict herewith, but in case of conflict the provisions of this Act shall control and be effective. All laws in conflict with this Act are hereby repealed to the extent of such conflict.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 1314, ch. 587.

Art. 2687d. MEETINGS OF TRUSTEES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES; COMPENSATION.

Section 1. In all counties in this State having a population of not less than fifty thousand, nine hundred and fifty (50,950) nor more than fifty-one thousand, one hundred (51,100), all counties having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand (34,000) nor more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), and all counties having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand, two hundred and twenty-five (29,225) nor more than twenty-nine thousand, two hundred and forty (29,240), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County School Trustees shall hold meetings once each quarter on the first Monday in August, November, February, and May, or as soon thereafter as is practicable, or such meetings may be held on the first Monday in each month and at such other times when called by the President of the Board of County School Trustees or at the instance of any two (2) members of such Board and the County Superintendent.

The meeting place shall be at the county seat, and, if convenient, in the office of the County Superintendent. Each Trustee shall be paid Four Dollars ($4) per day for the time spent in attending such meetings, not to exceed twenty-five (25) days in any one year, to be paid out of the State and County Available School Fund by warrant drawn on the order of the County Superintendent and signed by the President of the Board of County School Trustees, after approval of the account, properly sworn to by the President of the Board of County School Trustees.

Sec. 1a. In all counties in this State having a population of not less than twenty-three thousand and five (23,005) nor more than twenty-three thousand, three hundred (23,300), according to the last available Federal Census as same now exists or may hereafter exist, the County School Trustees shall hold meetings once each month on the first Monday in each month, or as soon thereafter as practicable, or at such other times when called by the President of the Board of County School Trustees, or at the instance of any three (3) members of said Board and the County Superintendent; the meeting place to be at the county seat and in the office of the County Superintendent, or at such other place in the County Courthouse as may be designated by the President of said Board of County School Trustees. Each County School Trustee shall be paid Five Dollars ($5) per day for the time spent in attending such meetings, not to exceed fifteen (15) days in any one year. Such compensation shall be paid out of the school administration fund of each county by warrants drawn against such fund as the law now provides, after the approval of this Act.

Sec. 1b. In all counties in this State having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand, eight hundred and thirty (31,830), nor more than thirty-two thousand, nine hundred and forty-one (32,941), according to the last available Federal Census as same now exists and may hereafter exist, the County School Trustees shall hold meetings once each month on the first Monday in each month, or as soon thereafter as practicable, or at such other times when called by the President of the Board of County School Trustees, or at the instance of any three (3) members of said Board and the County Superintendent; the meeting place to be at the county seat and in the office of the County Superintendent, or at such other place in the County Courthouse as may be designated by the President of said Board of County School Trustees. Each County School Trustee shall be paid Four Dollars ($4) per day for the time spent in attending such meeting, not to exceed eighteen (18) days in any one year. Such compensation shall be paid out of the school administration fund of each county by warrants drawn against such fund as the law now provides, after the approval of this Act.

Sec. 2. The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all existing laws on this subject when not in conflict herewith. All laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith are repealed.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 1302, ch. 577.

Art. 2688b. APPOINTMENT OF COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT IN COUNTIES OF OVER 350,000. In all counties having a population in excess of three hundred and fifty thousand (350,000) inhabitants, according to the last available Federal Census, the County Superintendent shall be appointed by the Board of County School Trustees and shall hold office for four (4) years.

Acts 1934, 43rd Leg., 2nd C.S., p. 162, ch. 67, Sec. 1.

Art. 2688d. CERTAIN COUNTIES OF NOT MORE THAN 4 SCHOOL DISTRICTS; OFFICE ABOLISHED; COUNTY JUDGE TO PERFORM DUTIES.

Section 1. In all counties of the State where, according to the preceding annual statistical report of the schools said county has not more than four (4) school districts, with one (1) of such districts comprising more than half of the county and having more than two thousand (2,000) pupils in average daily attendance in the one (1) district alone, and such district having an assessed valuation of more than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000) and where there is only one (1) common school district in such county with an average daily attendance of less than sixteen (16), the office of county superintendent is hereby abolished, to be effective at the end of the term of the incumbent county superintendent, as is now provided by law.

Sec. 2. Any duties that may still be required by law of the office of county superintendent of such counties that may come under Section 1 of this Act shall be performed by the county judge of said county as is now provided by law. (Articles 2701 and 3888, Revised Civil Statutes).

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 313, ch. 164.

Art. 2688g. COUNTIES OF 600,000 WITH 4 OR MORE SCHOOL DISTRICTS; ELECTION; ABOLITION OF OFFICE; TRANSFER OF DUTIES. (a) The electorate of any county in this State having a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, and wherein there are four (4) or more common school districts, shall, at the next General Election following the passage of this Act, determine by majority vote whether the office of county superintendent shall be abolished in said county. At such election all ballots shall have printed thereon the following:

"FOR the abolishment of the office of county superintendent."

"AGAINST the abolishment of the office of county superintendent."

(b) Where the majority of the qualified electors approve the abolition of the office of county superintendent in such counties, the duties of such abolished office as may still be required by law shall vest in the county judge in ex officio capacity upon the expiration of the current term of the office of county superintendent. In addition to all other compensation the county judge in such ex officio capacity shall receive a salary to be determined by the county board of school trustees. This additional compensation shall not exceed the maximum amount provided by Article 3888, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes.

Acts 1962, 57th Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 47, ch. 17, Sec. 1.

Art. 2688h. COUNTIES OF 190,000 TO 205,000; COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT AND BOARD OF TRUSTEES; ABOLITION OF OFFICES; TRANSFER OF DUTIES; ASSISTANTS TO COUNTY JUDGE. (a) Repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 237, p. 599, ch. 237, Sec. 145, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

(b) From and after May 1, 1962, the office of the county board of school trustees and the office of county superintendent shall cease to exist in any county in this State having a population of not less than 315,000 and not more than 351,000 which has no common school district and whose county ad valorem evaluation is in excess of Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000); provided, however, that the county superintendents in such counties who have been heretofore elected or appointed to the office of county superintendent shall serve until the expiration of the term for which they were elected or appointed. The duties now performed by the board of school trustees and county superintendents in such counties shall be performed by the County Judges of such counties.

(c) The county judge may name or appoint an assistant or assistants to help perform duties formerly performed by the board of school trustees and the county superintendent, and the salary for such assistant or assistants and all necessary office expenses and travel expenses relating to the performance of duties by such assistant or assistants or the county judge shall be paid from the County Available School Fund.

Subsec. (c) added by Acts 1969, 61st Leg., p. 2461, ch. 826, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1969; Subsecs. (a), (b) amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1840, ch. 542, Sec. 98, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Subsec. (c) amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 227, ch. 102, Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 1973; Subsecs. (b), (c) amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 571, ch. 237, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Subsec. (b) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Subsec. (b) amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 158, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 188, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 286, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 2688i-1. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS, EX OFFICIO COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS AND COUNTY BOARDS OF EDUCATION; ABOLITION OF OFFICES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES; TRANSFER OF DUTIES.

Sec. 1. This Act applies to a county

(1) if the office of county superintendent and the county school board has been abolished in the county; and

(2) if the county has one county-wide independent school district and no common school district.

Sec. 2. The office of ex officio county superintendent is abolished upon the effective date of this Act.

Sec. 3. All duties and functions, except as hereafter provided, that are now required by law of the office of ex officio county school superintendent, shall be performed by the superintendent of the independent school district, and all the duties that may now be required by law of the county board of education shall be performed by the elected board of trustees of such independent school district, except that the county judge shall, without pay from the State of Texas, continue to approve or disapprove application for school transfers to other schools outside of the county. The commissioners court shall hereafter receive, hear and pass upon all petitions for the calling of elections for the creation, change or abolishment of county school districts and all authorized appeals from the independent school board of trustees shall be made directly to the State Board of Education or to the courts as provided by law.

Sec. 4. All school records of the original independent and/or common school district shall be transferred to the control and custody of the independent school district office, save and except the original financial records which shall be retained by the county treasurer, and thereafter the county judge shall be required to make no records or reports but said reports shall be made by the superintendent of such independent school district; that as soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, all remaining state funds in the hands of the county board of education shall be transferred by the county treasurer and the county judge to the County Independent School District's Administration Account.

Sec. 5. The provisions of this Act shall not apply to counties having a population of not less than 4,700 and not more than 4,900 and to counties having a population of not less than 57,000 and not more than 57,900.

Sec. 6. No county having a population of more than 28,450 and less than 29,000 or a population of more than 31,045 and less than 31,247 shall have the offices of county school superintendent, ex officio county school superintendent, and county board of education.

All duties and functions, except as hereafter provided, that are otherwise required by law of the office of county school superintendent or ex officio county school superintendent governed by this section shall be performed by the superintendents of the independent and rural high school districts, and all duties that may otherwise be required by law of the county board of education governed by this section shall be performed by the elected Board of Trustees of such independent and rural high school districts, except that the County Judge shall, without pay from the State of Texas, continue to approve or disapprove application for school transfers. The Commissioners Court of such county shall hereafter receive, hear and pass upon all petitions for the calling of elections for the creation, change or abolishment of county school districts and all authorized appeals from the independent school Board of Trustees shall be made directly to the State Board of Education or to the courts as provided by law.

All school records of the original independent and/or common school district governed by this section, shall be transferred to the control and custody of the independent school district office, located at the county seat, save and except the original financial records which shall be retained by the county treasurer, and thereafter the County Judge shall be required to make no records or reports but said reports shall be made by the superintendent of such independent or rural school district; that as soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, all remaining State funds in the hands of the county board of education shall be transferred by the county treasurer and the County Judge to the independent and rural high school districts in proportion to the number of scholastics enrolled in such districts.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 1641, ch. 706, eff. Aug. 30, 1965. Sec. 5 amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1849, ch. 542, Sec. 126, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Sec. 6 amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1835, ch. 542, Sec. 79, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Secs. (5), (6) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Secs. 5, 6 amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 159, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 189, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 287, eff. September 1, 2023.

Art. 2688k. COUNTIES OF 16,000 OR MORE; EX OFFICIO SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT AND COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION; ABOLITION OF OFFICES; TRANSFER OF DUTIES.

Section 1. In all counties in this state having a population of sixteen thousand (16,000) or more, according to the last preceding Federal Census, and having no Common School District and only one Independent School District, the offices of the Ex Officio School Superintendent and County Board of Education is hereby abolished, effective as of the expiration of the current term of the incumbent Ex Officio School Superintendent.

Sec. 2. All duties and functions, except as hereafter provided, that are now required by law of the office of Ex Officio County School Superintendent, shall be performed by the Superintendent of the Independent School District, and all the duties that may now be required by law of the County Board of Education shall be performed by the elected Board of Trustees of such Independent School District, except that the County Judge shall, without pay from the State of Texas, continue to approve or disapprove application for school transfers to other schools outside of the county. The Commissioners Court shall hereafter receive, hear and pass upon all petitions for the calling of elections for the creation, change or abolishment of County School Districts and all authorized appeals from the Independent School Board of Trustees shall be made directly to the State Board of Education or to the courts as provided by law.

Sec. 3. All School Records of the original Independent and/or Common School District, shall be transferred to the control and custody of the Independent School District Office, save and except the original financial records which shall be retained by the County Treasurer, and thereafter the County Judge shall be required to make no records or reports but said reports shall be made by the Superintendent of such Independent School District; that as soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, all remaining state funds in the hands of the County Board of Education shall be transferred by the County Treasurer and the County Judge to the County Independent School District's Administration Account.

Acts 1963, 58th Leg., p. 1150, ch. 446.

Art. 2688n. COUNTIES OF 25,750 TO 28,000; COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS; ABOLITION OF OFFICE; TRANSFER OF DUTIES. The office of County Superintendent is abolished in all counties having a population of not less than 25,750 nor more than 28,000 according to the last preceding Federal Census. After the effective date of this Act, the duties of the office shall be performed by the County Judge as ex officio County Superintendent.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 1509, ch. 654, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1965.

Art. 2700b. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY AND OFFICE EXPENSES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES.

Section 1. That the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than 60,000 nor more than 73,000 according to the last Federal census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of $2,800.00 per annum nor more than the sum of $3,800.00 per annum.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of the counties having a population of not less than 60,000 nor more than 73,000, the County School Trustees shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available Funds for the payment of the salary of the Superintendent of Public Instruction not less than $2,800.00 nor more than $3,800.00 and office expenses in any sum not exceeding $200.00 per annum for stamps and stationery; and the Commissioners' Courts of the Counties having a population of not less than 60,000 nor more than 73,000 may expend out of the general funds of said counties any sums not exceeding the sum of $600.00 per annum to defray the expenses incurred by said County Superintendent which said sum shall be paid by said Commissioners upon certificate of said Superintendent that the expenses have been incurred in the discharge of his duties as such Superintendent.

Sec. 3. The salary to be paid monthly upon the order of the School Trustees; provided, that the salary for the month of September shall not have been paid until the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all reports required of him; that the expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners' Court.

Acts 1927, 40th Leg., p. 394, ch. 267.

Art. 2700c. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY AND OFFICE EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 12,100 TO 12,190 POPULATION.

Section 1. That the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each County in Texas having a population of not less than twelve thousand one hundred (12,100) and not more than twelve thousand one hundred and ninety (12,190), according to the last available Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of twenty-one Hundred Dollars ($2100.00) and not more than the sum of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) per annum.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of the counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand one hundred (12,100) and not more than twelve thousand one hundred and ninety (12,190), according to the last available Federal Census, the county school trustees shall also make an allowance out of the State and County Available Funds for the payment of the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, not less than Twenty-one Hundred Dollars ($2100.00) nor more than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), and an office expense not exceeding Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per annum for stamps and stationery, and the Commissioners' Courts of the counties herein affected may expend out of the General Fund of such counties any sums not exceeding Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per annum to defray the traveling expenses incurred by said County Superintendent, which said sum shall be paid by said Commissioners' Courts upon certificate of said Superintendent that the expenses have been incurred in the discharge of his duties as such Superintendent.

Sec. 3. The salary shall be paid monthly upon order of the county school trustees; providing that the month of September shall not be paid until the County Superintendent shall have presented a receipt or a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction, showing that he had made all reports required of him; the expenses herein authorized shall be paid monthly by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners' Court.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 90, ch. 44; Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., Spec.L., p. 433, ch. 219.

Art. 2700d. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY AND EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 100,000 TO 150,000 POPULATION.

Section 1. That the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each County in Texas, having a population of not less than 100,000 nor more than 150,000 according to the last Federal Census, shall from and after passage of this Act be not less than the sum of $2,800.00 per annum, or more than the sum of $3,800.00 per annum.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of the Counties having a population of not less than 100,000 and not more than 150,000 the County School Trustees shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available Funds for the payment of the salary of the Superintendent of Public Instruction not less than $2,800.00 nor more than $3,800.00 and the Commissioner's Courts of the Counties having a population of not less than 100,000 nor more than 150,000 may expend out of the general fund of said counties any sums not exceeding the sum of $1200 per annum, to defray the expenses incurred by said County Superintendent which said sum or any part thereof shall be paid by said Commissioners upon certificate of said Superintendent that the expenses have been incurred in the discharge of his duties as such superintendent.

Sec. 3. Said salary to be paid monthly upon the order of the county school trustees, provided that said salary to the Superintendent of public instruction for the month of September shall not be paid until the Superintendent shall have presented a receipt or certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all reports required of him; that the expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioner's Court.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 323, ch. 148.

Art. 2700d-2. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES HAVING A POPULATION OF 4,660 AND NOT MORE THAN 4,700.

Section 1. That the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than 4,660 nor more than 4,700 according to the Federal Census of 1920, shall, from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of $2,400.00 per annum nor more than the sum of $3,000.00 per annum.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of the counties having a population of not less than 4,660 nor more than 4,700 according to the Federal Census of 1920, the County School Trustees shall also make an allowance out of the State and County Available Funds for the payment of the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction not less than $2,400.00 nor more than $3,000.00 and office expenses not exceeding $300.00 per annum for stamps and stationery; and the Commissioners' Courts of the counties having a population of not less than 4,660 nor more than 4,700 may expend out of the general funds of such counties any sums not exceeding the sum of $300.00 per annum to defray the traveling expenses incurred by said County Superintendent, which said sum shall be paid by said Commissioners upon certificate of said Superintendent that the expenses have been incurred in the discharge of his duties as such Superintendent.

Sec. 3. The salary shall be paid monthly upon the order of the County School Trustees; provided, that the month of September shall not be paid until the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all the reports required by him; that the expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners' Court.

Acts 1930, 41st Leg., 5th C.S., p. 255, ch. 83.

Art. 2700d-4. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 2865 AND NOT MORE THAN 2870, ETC. That the salary of County Superintendents of Public Instruction in all counties in Texas having not less than two thousand eight hundred and sixty-five (2,865) and not more than two thousand eight hundred and seventy (2,870) population and in all counties in Texas having not less than three thousand eight hundred and fifty (3,850) and not more than three thousand nine hundred (3,900) population, and in all counties in Texas having not less than four thousand nine hundred and fifteen (4,915) and not more than four thousand nine hundred and twenty (4,920) population, each, according to the last preceding Federal Census from and after the effective date of this Act shall be paid from the Available School Fund of such County.

Acts 1935, 44th Leg., p. 197, ch. 80, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-5. SUPERINTENDENT'S EXPENDITURES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. In counties having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand (77,000), and not more than seventy-seven thousand, six hundred (77,600), and in counties having a population of not less than fifteen thousand, five hundred and fifty (15,550), and not more than fifteen thousand, five hundred and sixty (15,560), and in counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand, one hundred and thirty (19,130) and not more than nineteen thousand, three hundred (19,300); and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand, six hundred (34,600) and not more than thirty-four thousand, seven hundred (34,700), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1935, 44th Leg., p. 545, ch. 232, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-6. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY AND TRAVELING EXPENSES. In counties having a population of not less than thirty thousand (30,000) and not more than thirty thousand and twenty-nine (30,029), and counties having a population of not less than eighteen thousand four hundred twenty-five (18,425) and not more than eighteen thousand five hundred twenty-eight (18,528), and counties having a population of not less than forty-three thousand one hundred (43,100) and not more than forty-three thousand three hundred (43,300) and counties having a population of not less than twenty-three thousand eight hundred and eighty (23,880) and not more than twenty-three thousand nine hundred (23,900), and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand (34,000) and not more than thirty-five thousand five hundred (35,500), and in counties having a population of not less than eighteen thousand eight hundred fifty (18,850) and not more than eighteen thousand eight hundred seventy-five (18,875), and counties having a population of not less than ten thousand one hundred fifty-three (10,153) inhabitants and not more than ten thousand one hundred fifty-six (10,156) inhabitants, and counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand one hundred (19,100) and not more than nineteen thousand one hundred fifty (19,150), and counties having a population of not less than thirty thousand four hundred (30,400) and not more than thirty thousand six hundred (30,600), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred ($600.00) Dollars per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1935, 44th Leg., 2nd C.S., p. 1852, ch. 471, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-7. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT'S OFFICE AND TRAVELLING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF ENUMERATED POPULATION.

Section 1. COUNTIES OF 24,060 TO 24,075. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand and sixty (24,060) and not more than twenty-four thousand and seventy-five (24,075), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-a. COUNTIES OF 30,288 TO 30,292. In counties having a population of not less than thirty thousand, two hundred eighty-eight (30,288), nor more than thirty thousand, two hundred ninety-two (30,292), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-b. COUNTIES OF 12,469 TO 12,473. In counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, four hundred sixty-nine (12,469), nor more than twelve thousand, four hundred seventy-three (12,473), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-c. COUNTIES OF 27,800 TO 27,804. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand, eight hundred (27,800), nor more than twenty-seven thousand, eight hundred four (27,804), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-d. COUNTIES OF 11,996 TO 12,000. In counties having a population of not less than eleven thousand, nine hundred ninety-six (11,996), nor more than twelve thousand (12,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-e. COUNTIES OF 12,522 TO 12,526. In counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, five hundred twenty-two (12,522), nor more than twelve thousand, five hundred twenty-six (12,526), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-f. COUNTIES OF 17,062 TO 17,066. In counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand, sixty-two (17,062), nor more than seventeen thousand, sixty-six (17,066), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-g. COUNTIES OF 11,446 TO 11,450. In counties having a population of not less than eleven thousand, four hundred forty-six (11,446), nor more than eleven thousand, four hundred fifty (11,450), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-h. COUNTIES OF 14,586 TO 14,590. In counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, five hundred eighty-six (14,586), nor more than fourteen thousand, five hundred ninety (14,590) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-i. COUNTIES OF 22,640 TO 22,644. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-two thousand, six hundred forty (22,640), nor more than twenty-two thousand, six hundred forty-four (22,644), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-j. COUNTIES OF 13,934 TO 13,938. In counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, nine hundred thirty-four (13,934), nor more than thirteen thousand, nine hundred thirty-eight (13,938) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-k. COUNTIES OF 28,625 TO 28,630. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand, six hundred twenty-five (28,625), nor more than twenty-eight thousand, six hundred thirty (28,630), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-l. COUNTIES OF 15,147 TO 15,152. In counties having a population of not less than fifteen thousand, one hundred forty-seven (15,147), nor more than fifteen thousand, one hundred fifty-two (15,152), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 2. PROVISIONS CUMULATIVE; CONFLICTING LAWS. The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all General Laws on the subject and where not otherwise provided herein, such General Laws shall apply; but, in case of conflict, the provisions of this Act shall control and be effective.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 35, ch. 27.

Art. 2700d-8. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENT AND ASSISTANTS.

Section 1. COUNTIES WITH 14,540-14,580 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, five hundred and forty (14,540) and not more than fourteen thousand, five hundred and eighty (14,580), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1a. COUNTIES WITH 48,563-48,663 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand, five hundred sixty-three (48,563) and not more than forty-eight thousand, six hundred sixty-three (48,663), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent.

Sec. 1b. COUNTIES WITH 10,371-10,471 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than ten thousand, three hundred seventy-one (10,371) and not more than ten thousand, four hundred seventy-one (10,471), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent.

Sec. 1c. COUNTIES WITH 30,030-30,130 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than thirty thousand, thirty (30,030) and not more than thirty thousand, one hundred thirty (30,130), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent.

Sec. 1d. COUNTIES WITH 10,028-10,128 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than ten thousand, twenty-eight (10,028) and not more than ten thousand, one hundred twenty-eight (10,128), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the Office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1e. COUNTIES WITH 16,003-16,010 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than sixteen thousand, three (16,003) and not more than sixteen thousand, ten (16,010), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 111, ch. 64.

Art. 2700d-9. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT'S OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 13,125 TO 13,145. In counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, one hundred and twenty-five (13,125) and not more than thirteen thousand, one hundred and forty-five (13,145), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 142, ch. 75, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-10. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 30,708 TO 30,750. In counties having a population of not less than thirty thousand, seven hundred and eight (30,708) and not more than thirty thousand, seven hundred and fifty (30,750), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 156, ch. 82, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-11. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 49,000 TO 49,025. In all counties containing a population of not less than forty-nine thousand (49,000), nor more than forty-nine thousand and twenty-five (49,025), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Superintendents shall receive from the available school funds of their respective counties, for office and traveling expenses, a sum not to exceed Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 243, ch. 127, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-12. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 29,400 TO 29,450 AND OTHER COUNTIES.

Section 1. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand, four hundred (29,400) and not more than twenty-nine thousand, four hundred and fifty (29,450), in counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, six hundred (13,600) and not more than thirteen thousand, seven hundred (13,700), and counties having a population of not less than thirty four thousand, six hundred and forty (34,640) and not more than thirty four thousand, six hundred and sixty (34,660), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-a. In counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, six hundred and thirty-seven (13,637) and not more than thirteen thousand, six hundred and forty (13,640) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent; and provided further that the provisions of this Act shall apply to counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand, five hundred and fifty-five (17,555) and not more than seventeen thousand, five hundred and sixty (17,560) according to the last preceding Federal Census, and that the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 199, ch. 105.

Art. 2700d-13. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 32,400 TO 32,500. In counties having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand, four hundred (32,400) and not more than thirty-two thousand, five hundred (32,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 254, ch. 132, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-14. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 27,441 TO 27,450 AND OTHER COUNTIES. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand, four hundred and forty-one (27,441) and not more than twenty-seven thousand, four hundred and fifty (27,450), and in counties having a population of not less than twenty thousand and forty-eight (20,048) and not more than twenty thousand and fifty-five (20,055), and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-five thousand, three hundred and ninety-four (25,394) and not more than twenty-five thousand, four hundred (25,400), and in counties having a population of not less than ten thousand, nine hundred seventy-five (10,975) and not more than ten thousand, nine hundred and eighty-five (10,985), according to the last preceding Federal Census, and the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; providing that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 258, ch. 135, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-15. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 10,050 TO 10,075 AND CERTAIN OTHER COUNTIES.

Section 1. In counties having a population of not less than ten thousand and fifty (10,050) and not more than ten thousand and seventy-five (10,075), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-a. In counties having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand, three hundred and twelve (32,312) and not more than thirty-two thousand, three hundred and twenty (32,320), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions that they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of County Superintendent of Public Instruction, provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 1-b. In counties having a population of not more than twenty-four thousand, one hundred and eighty (24,180) and not less than twenty-four thousand and forty (24,040) and in counties having a population of not more than forty-six thousand, two hundred and eighty (46,280) and not less than forty-six thousand, one hundred and eighty (46,180), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions that they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of County Superintendent of Public Instruction, provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 395, ch. 197.

Art. 2700d-16. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES OF COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS AND ASSISTANTS IN COUNTIES OF ENUMERATED POPULATION. In counties with a population of not less than sixteen thousand, six hundred (16,600) and not more than seventeen thousand, sixty (17,060); and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand, seven hundred and sixty (38,760) inhabitants and not more than thirty-eight thousand, seven hundred and eighty (38,780) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-six thousand, three hundred and eighty-two (26,382) and not more than twenty-six thousand, four hundred (26,400) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-three thousand, six hundred and sixty-nine (23,669) nor more than twenty-three thousand, seven hundred and seventy-five (23,775) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand, one hundred and seventy-three (19,173) nor more than nineteen thousand, one hundred and eighty-three (19,183) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand, five hundred and sixty-five (17,565) nor more than seventeen thousand, five hundred and eighty-five (17,585) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand, five hundred and eighteen (48,518) nor more than forty-eight thousand, five hundred and thirty-eight (48,538) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than fifty-three thousand, nine hundred and twenty-five (53,925) nor more than fifty-three thousand, nine hundred and forty-seven (53,947) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-three thousand, three hundred and seven (33,307) nor more than thirty-three thousand, three hundred and twenty-eight (33,328) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand, three hundred and ninety-five (31,395) nor more than thirty-one thousand, four hundred (31,400) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, nine hundred and ten (14,910) nor more than fourteen thousand, nine hundred and seventeen (14,917) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than eight thousand, six hundred (8,600) nor more than eight thousand, six hundred and ten (8,610) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than five thousand, six hundred and sixty-five (5,665) nor more than five thousand, six hundred and seventy (5,670) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, one hundred and eighty-five (12,185) nor more than twelve thousand, one hundred and ninety (12,190) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than five thousand, five hundred and eighty-five (5,585) nor more than five thousand, five hundred and eighty-nine (5,589) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than forty-one thousand, twenty (41,020) nor more than forty-one thousand, thirty (41,030) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than forty-three thousand, thirty-five (43,035) nor more than forty-three thousand, forty (43,040) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twenty thousand, one hundred (20,100) nor more than twenty thousand, one hundred and fifty (20,150) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than nine thousand, twenty-five (9,025) nor more than nine thousand, fifty (9,050) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand, one hundred (39,100) and not more than thirty-nine thousand, one hundred and ten (39,110) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, three hundred and seventy (12,370) nor more than twelve thousand, three hundred and eighty (12,380) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, five hundred and seventy (13,570) and not more than thirteen thousand, five hundred and eighty (13,580) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand, one hundred and fifty-five (34,155) nor more than thirty-four thousand, one hundred and sixty (34,160) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, seven hundred and eighty-five (12,785) nor more than twelve thousand, seven hundred and ninety (12,790) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand, three hundred and twenty (19,320) nor more than nineteen thousand, three hundred and twenty-five (19,325) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, one hundred and eighty (14,180) nor more than fourteen thousand, one hundred and eighty-five (14,185) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand, two hundred and thirty (24,230) nor more than twenty-four thousand, two hundred and thirty-five (24,235) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than six thousand, six hundred and ninety-five (6,695) nor more than six thousand, seven hundred (6,700) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than sixteen thousand, five hundred and sixty (16,560) nor more than sixteen thousand, five hundred and sixty-five (16,565) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than five thousand, two hundred and fifty (5,250) nor more than five thousand, two hundred and fifty-five (5,255) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than sixteen thousand, six hundred and sixty-five (16,665) nor more than sixteen thousand, six hundred and seventy (16,670) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand, three hundred and sixty (12,360) nor more than twelve thousand, four hundred and twenty (12,420) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, five hundred and sixty (13,560) nor more than thirteen thousand, five hundred and eighty-five (13,585) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than eight thousand, five hundred and ninety (8,590) nor more than eight thousand, eight hundred and ninety (8,890) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than nine thousand, two hundred and ninety (9,290) and not more than nine thousand, four hundred (9,400) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than six thousand, eight hundred (6,800) and not more than six thousand, eight hundred and thirty (6,830) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand, four hundred and forty-five (17,445) and not more than seventeen thousand, four hundred and sixty-five (17,465) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than eleven thousand, twenty-one (11,021) and not more than eleven thousand, fifty (11,050) inhabitants; and in counties having a population of not less than sixteen thousand, twenty (16,020) and not more than sixteen thousand, five hundred (16,500) inhabitants according to the last Federal Census in each instance, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and/or traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and any assistant he may have; provided that the amount of such expenditures for such necessary office and/or traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount of such expenses so allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 836, ch. 411, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-17. SALARY AND EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF ENUMERATED POPULATION.

Section 1. SALARIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. In all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand eight hundred (32,800) and not more than thirty-two thousand eight hundred thirty (32,830), and in all counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand (24,000) and not more than twenty-four thousand sixty-three (24,063), and in all counties having a population of not less than thirty-seven thousand nine hundred (37,900) and not more than thirty-seven thousand nine hundred fifty (37,950), and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand four hundred twenty-five (27,425) and not more than twenty-seven thousand four hundred sixty (27,460), and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand three hundred twenty-five (31,325) and not more than thirty-one thousand four hundred twenty-five (31,425) and in counties having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand five hundred (48,500) and not more than forty-eight thousand five hundred seventy-five (48,575), and in counties having a population of not less than eleven thousand four hundred (11,400) and not more than eleven thousand five hundred (11,500), and in counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand seven hundred sixty (17,760) and not more than seventeen thousand seven hundred eighty (17,780), the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be not less than Two Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty ($2,750.00) Dollars and not more than Three Thousand ($3,000.00) Dollars per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by the order of the County Board of Education for the respective counties, and the County Board of Education for each of the counties coming within this bill shall, by order entered in its minutes, set the salary for each of their respective counties.

Sec. 2. ALLOWANCE OUT OF STATE AND COUNTY AVAILABLE SCHOOL FUND; PRORATION OF ALLOWANCE. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the public free schools, the County Board of Education of each of the several counties mentioned in Section 1 of this Act shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available School Fund not exceeding the sum of Three Thousand ($3,000.00) Dollars for the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction and Six Hundred ($600.00) Dollars for traveling expenses incidental to and necessary in the administration of the County Superintendent's office annually, and the same shall be prorated to the schools in said county in proportion to the scholastic population of each school district in each of said respective counties, and the Commissioners' Court of each of said counties may expend out of the General Fund of said counties not to exceed Three Hundred ($300.00) Dollars per annum to defray the office expenses for stamps, stationery, telephone, and printing, incidental to and necessary in the efficient administration of the schools of said counties respectively.

Sec. 3. SALARIES IN COUNTIES HAVING ENUMERATED POPULATION. In all counties of the state of Texas having a population of not less than sixteen thousand five hundred fifty (16,550) nor more than sixteen thousand six hundred (16,600) according to the last United States Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be fixed by order of the County Board of Education in and for such counties at an amount not less than Eighteen Hundred ($1800.00) Dollars per year nor more than Two Thousand Two Hundred and Fifty ($2,250.00) Dollars per year, and said salary shall be exclusive of any and all traveling expenses allowed by law; and in all counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand five hundred sixty-five (17,565) nor more than seventeen thousand six hundred (17,600) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be fixed by order of the County Board of Education in and for such counties at an amount not less than Nineteen Hundred ($1900.00) Dollars per year nor more than Two Thousand Two Hundred and Fifty ($2,250.00) Dollars per year, and said salary shall be exclusive of any and all traveling expenses allowed by law.

Sec. 4. TIME FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES AND EXPENSES. The salary and traveling expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly, upon the order of the County Board of Education; provided that the salary for the month of September shall not be paid until the said County Superintedent submits a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that all reports required have been made to the State Department of Education. That the office expenses provided herein shall be paid by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners' Court as said expenses may be incurred.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., p. 1276, ch. 477.

Art. 2700d-18. SALARY AND EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF ENUMERATED POPULATION.

Section 1. SALARIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-one thousand, eight hundred and sixteen (21,816) and not more than twenty-one thousand, eight hundred and twenty-six (21,826); in all counties having a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) and not more than forty-two thousand (42,000); in counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, three hundred and eighty-five (13,385) and not more than thirteen thousand, three hundred and ninety-five (13,395); in counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand, eight hundred and forty-three (19,843) and not more than nineteen thousand, eight hundred and fifty-three (19,853); in counties having a population of not less than thirty-six thousand (36,000) and not more than thirty-six thousand and fifty (36,050); and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand, seven hundred (29,700) and not more than twenty-nine thousand, seven hundred and fifty (29,750) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; providing that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum.

Sec. 2. SALARIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. In all Counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than seventeen thousand six hundred and sixty (17,660) inhabitants and not more than seventeen thousand eight hundred and fifty (17,850) inhabitants according to the preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be not less than Two Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty ($2,750.00) Dollars and not more than Three Thousand ($3,000.00) Dollars per annum; and in all Counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than twenty nine thousand seven hundred (29,700) and not more than twenty nine thousand seven hundred fifty (29,750) inhabitants according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of Twenty Four Hundred ($2,400.00) Dollars per annum nor more than the sum of Three Thousand ($3,000.00) Dollars per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by the order of the County Board of Education for the said Counties, and the County Board of Education for each of the Counties coming within the terms of this bill shall by order entered in its minutes set the salary for each of their respective Counties.

The amount of salaries allowed hereunder shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with the now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent; provided, however, the salary herein provided for shall be paid monthly upon order of the County School Trustees; and provided further that the salary for the month of September shall not be paid until the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all the reports required of him by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Sec. 2a. ALLOWANCE OUT OF STATE AND COUNTY AVAILABLE SCHOOL FUND; PRORATION OF ALLOWANCE. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the public free schools, the County Board of Education of each of the counties coming under Section 2 of this Act shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available School Fund not exceeding the sum of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) for the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction and Six Hundred Dollars ($600) for traveling expenses incidental to and necessary in the administration of the County Superintendent's office annually, and the same shall be prorated to the schools in said counties in proportion to the scholastic population of each school district in each of said respective counties, and the Commissioners Court of each of said counties may expend out of the General Fund of said counties not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum to defray the office expenses for stamps, stationery, telephone, and printing, incidental to and necessary in the efficient administration of the schools of said counties respectively.

Sec. 2b. MONTHLY PAYMENTS OF SALARIES AND EXPENSES; PREREQUISITES. The salary and traveling expenses provided for in Sections 2 and 2a shall be paid monthly, upon the order of the County Board of Education; provided that the salary for the month of September shall not be paid until the said County Superintendent submits a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that all reports required have been made to the State Department of Education. That the office expenses provided herein shall be paid by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners Court as said expenses may be incurred.

Sec. 2c. SALARIES AND EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 30,000 TO 30,100 POPULATION. In all counties in the State of Texas having a population of not less than thirty thousand (30,000) nor more than thirty thousand and one hundred (30,100), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be not less than Twenty-seven Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($2,750) nor more than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by the order of the County Board of Education for the respective county.

Subsection 1. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the public free schools, the County Board of Education of each such county mentioned in Section 1 of this Act shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available School Fund not exceeding the sum of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) for the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction and Six Hundred Dollars ($600) for traveling expenses incidental to and necessary in the administration of the County Superintendent's office annually, and the same shall be prorated to the schools in said county in proportion to the scholastic population of each school district in each of said respective counties, and the Commissioners Court of each of said counties may expend out of the General Fund of said county not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum to defray the office expense for stamps, stationery, telephone and printing incidental to and necessary in the efficient administration of the schools in said counties respectively.

Subsection 2. The salary and traveling expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly on the order of the County Board of Education; provided that the salary for the month of September shall not be paid until the County Superintendent submits a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that all reports required have been made to the State Department of Education. That the office expense provided herein shall be paid by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners Court as said expenses may be incurred.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 1805, ch. 29; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 632, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-19. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT--EXPENSES.

Section 1. COUNTIES TO WHICH APPLICABLE. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-one thousand, eight hundred and thirty-five (21,835) and not more than twenty-one thousand, eight hundred and fifty (21,850), and in counties having a population of not less than fifty thousand (50,000) and not more than fifty thousand, one hundred (50,100), and in counties having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand, nine hundred (48,900) and not more than forty-nine thousand (49,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the county boards of trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the county superintendent of public instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the county superintendent.

Sec. 2. ACT CUMULATIVE. The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all General Laws on the subject and where not otherwise provided herein, such General Laws shall apply; but, in case of conflict, the provisions of this Act shall control and be effective.

Acts 1937, 45th Leg., 2nd C.S., p. 1944, ch. 43.

Art. 2700d-20. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 15,760 TO 15,790. From and after the effective date of this Act in all counties having a population of not less than fifteen thousand, seven hundred and sixty (15,760) and not more than fifteen thousand, seven hundred and ninety (15,790), and having an area of three hundred and twelve (312) square miles according to the last preceding Federal Census, the county board of trustees shall make provision for the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction in the sum of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000) per year and no more. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the payment of maintenance and salaries of county superintendents.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 631, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-21. TRAVELING EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF 15,725 TO 15,775 POPULATION. From and after the passage of this Act that all County Superintendents of Public Instruction in all counties having a population of not less than fifteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (15,725) and not more than fifteen thousand seven hundred seventy-five (15,775) according to the last preceding Federal Census shall be and are allowed an additional Five Hundred ($500.00) Dollars per year for traveling expenses.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 652, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-22. SALARY AND EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF ENUMERATED POPULATION.

Section 1. COUNTIES WITH 50,000 TO 51,000; 38,765 TO 38,775; 29,210 TO 29,630. From and after the passage of this Act in all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than fifty thousand (50,000) and not more than fifty-one thousand (51,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be not less than Three Thousand, Three Hundred Dollars ($3,300) nor more than Three Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600) per annum to be fixed by order of the board of education of such counties; and in counties having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand, seven hundred and sixty-five (38,765) and not more than thirty-eight thousand, seven hundred and seventy-five (38,775), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be Three Thousand, Three Hundred Dollars ($3,300) per annum; all counties in this State which have a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand, two hundred and ten (29,210) and not more than twenty-nine thousand, six hundred and thirty (29,630) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) per year or Two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($250) per month, to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by general law governing the maintenance of the office of county superintendent, as provided in Article 2700, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas of 1925.

Sec. 2. COUNTIES OF 77,750 TO 77,800. In counties having a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand, seven hundred and fifty (77,750) and not more than seventy-seven thousand, eight hundred (77,800), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be Three Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600) per annum. Such salary shall be paid in accordance with existing laws governing such office.

Sec. 3. COUNTIES OF NOT OVER 70,000 WITH TWO CITIES OVER 13,800. From and after the passage of this Act in all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not more than seventy thousand (70,000), according to the last preceding Federal Census, and having at least two (2) incorporated cities within their boundary with a population of more than thirteen thousand, eight hundred (13,800) each, according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be not less than the sum of Two Thousand, Eight Hundred Dollars ($2,800) per annum nor more than the sum of Three Thousand, Eight Hundred Dollars ($3,800) per annum, to be fixed by the county board of education of each of such counties, and in making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of such counties, the county board of education of such counties shall make an annual allowance out of the State and county available school funds for the payment of the salary of the superintendents of public instruction for such counties; and in addition thereto, office expenses of an amount not in excess of Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum for stamps, stationery and telephone; and said county board of education is also authorized to allow for traveling expenses of such county superintendents a sum not in excess of Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum to defray the expenses incurred by such county superintendents, which said sum shall be paid by said county board of education upon certificate of such superintendents that the expenses have been incurred in the discharge of their duties as such superintendents, and the salary and expenses herein provided to be paid monthly upon the order of the school trustees; providing that the salaries for the month of September shall not be paid until the county superintendent of public instruction shall have presented a receipt or certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all reports required of him, that the expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly by the county treasurer on the order of the county board of education.

Sec. 4. COUNTIES OF 20,000 TO 20,050. In counties having a population of not less than twenty thousand (20,000) and not more than twenty thousand and fifty (20,050) according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be not less than the sum of Two Thousand, Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500) per annum nor more than the sum of Three Thousand, Two Hundred Dollars ($3,200) per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by order of the county board of education for the respective counties, and the county board of education for each county coming within this section shall, by order entered in its minutes, set the salary for each of the respective counties. The salary allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with existing laws governing the office of the county superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 5. COUNTIES OF 23,000 TO 23,400; 17,600 TO 17,650; 15,700 TO 15,730. That the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction in all counties in Texas having not less than twenty-three thousand, three hundred (23,300) nor more than twenty-three thousand, four hundred (23,400) population, according to the last preceding Federal Census, and in all counties having not less than seventeen thousand, six hundred (17,600) nor more than seventeen thousand, six hundred and fifty (17,650) population, according to the last preceding Federal Census; in all counties having not less than fifteen thousand, seven hundred (15,700) nor more than fifteen thousand, seven hundred and thirty (15,730) population, according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall be, from and after the effective date of this Act, Two Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($2,600) per year to be paid in twelve equal payments out of the State and county available school fund of such counties.

Sec. 6. COUNTIES OF 30,275 TO 30,300. From and after the passage of this Act in all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not more than thirty thousand, three hundred (30,300) nor less than thirty thousand, two hundred and seventy-five (30,275), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall be not less than the sum of Two Thousand, Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400) per annum nor more than the sum of Three Thousand, Two Hundred Dollars ($3,200) per annum to be fixed by the county board of education of each of such counties, and in making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of such counties, the county board of education of such counties shall make an annual allowance out of the State and county available school funds for the payment of the salary of the superintendent of public instruction for such counties payable in twelve equal payments out of the State and county available school fund of such counties.

Sec. 7. COUNTIES OF 18,000 TO 18,500. In all counties having a population of not less than eighteen thousand (18,000) and not more than eighteen thousand, five hundred (18,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the county board of education shall, in addition to the salaries and expenses fixed by law, allow not to exceed the sum of Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum for the actual traveling expenses of such county superintendents made in the performance of their duties as county superintendents and to be paid out of the State and county available school fund of such counties on order of the county board of education of such counties on the verified account of such county superintendents.

Sec. 8. CONFLICTING LAWS; ACT AS CUMULATIVE. All laws and parts of laws, whether here referred to by article, title or number or not, general or special, in conflict herewith, are hereby modified and limited to the extent that they are not to be controlling, but the specific provisions of this Act shall be controlling in the counties to which it is made applicable. The provisions of this Act are cumulative of the general law on the subject, and where not otherwise modified hereby such general laws are made applicable.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 643.

Art. 2700d-23. EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENT AND TRUSTEES IN ADMINISTRATION OF SCHOLASTIC AFFAIRS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. In each county of this State with a population of not less than thirty thousand, nine hundred and twenty (30,920) and not more than thirty thousand, nine hundred and twenty-five (30,925), and in counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, four hundred and sixty (14,460) and not more than fourteen thousand, four hundred and sixty-five (14,465), and in counties having a population of not less than seven thousand, one hundred (7,100) and not more than seven thousand, one hundred and twenty-five (7,125), as shown by the Federal Census last preceding such action, the County School Board of Trustees is hereby authorized to set aside from the Available School Funds of the county, in accordance wtih the provisions of the General Law governing the assessment for the support of the County Superintendent's Office, an amount not to exceed Six Hundred Dollars ($600) to defray the expenses of the County Superintendent and County School Board of Trustees of such counties in the administration of the scholastic affairs of the county.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 656, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-24. TRAVELING AND OTHER EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENT IN COUNTIES OF 19,890 TO 19,905 POPULATION.

Section 1. In counties having a population of not less than nineteen thousand, eight hundred and ninety (19,890) and not more than nineteen thousand, nine hundred and five (19,905), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Sec. 2. The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all General Laws on the subject and, where not otherwise provided herein, such General Laws shall apply; but, in case of conflict, the provisions of this Act shall control and be effective.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 653.

Art. 2700d-25. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 18,760 TO 18,960 POPULATION. In counties having a population of not less than eighteen thousand, seven hundred and sixty (18,760) and not more than eighteen thousand, nine hundred and sixty (18,960), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be not less than the sum of One Thousand, Nine Hundred Dollars ($1,900) per annum nor more than the sum of Two Thousand, Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400) per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by order of the County Board of Education for the respective counties, and the County Board of Education for each county coming within this Act shall by order entered in its Minutes, set the salary for each of the respective counties. The salary allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with existing laws governing the office of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 634, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-26. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 29,750 TO 30,025 POPULATION; REPORTS.

Section 1. The salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas, having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand, seven hundred and fifty (29,750) nor more than thirty thousand and twenty-five (30,025) according to the last Federal Census, shall from and after passage of this Act be not less than the sum of Three Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600) per annum.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the schools of the counties having a population of not less then twenty-nine thousand, seven hundred and fifty (29,750) and not more than thirty thousand and twenty-five (30,025) the County School Trustees shall make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available Funds for the payment of the salary of the Superintendent of Public Instruction not less than Three Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600).

Sec. 3. Said salary to be paid monthly upon the order of the County School Trustees, provided that said salary to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the month of September shall not be paid until the Superintendent shall have presented a receipt or certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all reports required of him.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 640.

Art. 2700d-27. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARIES IN COUNTIES HAVING POPULATION OF 22,100 TO 22,500; 41,050 TO 42,100; 22,600 TO 22,800; 14,550 TO 14,800; 11,021 TO 11,050; REPORTS.

Section 1. From and after the passage of this Act, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than twenty-two thousand, one hundred (22,100) and not more than twenty-two thousand, five hundred (22,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall be Thirty-six Hundred Dollars ($3600) per annum, to be paid in equal monthly payments out of the county's available per capita apportionment coming to such counties, upon the order of the County School Trustees.

Sec. 2. The salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than forty-one thousand and fifty (41,050) and not more than forty-two thousand, one hundred (42,100), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of Two Thousand, Eight Hundred Dollars ($2,800) per annum and not more than Three Thousand, Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600) per annum to be fixed by the County Board of Education of each county; and in addition thereto, the county superintendents of such counties shall receive office expenses for stamps, telephone, and stationery not exceeding Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum, as well as an amount not in excess of Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum to defray traveling expenses incurred by such county superintendents, which said sum shall be paid by said County Board of Trustees on the certificate of such superintendent that the expenses had been incurred in the discharge of his duties as such superintendent.

Sec. 2-a. The salary and expenses provided for in Section 2 of this Act shall be paid monthly upon the order of the County School Trustees of such counties out of the county's available and State per capita apportionment coming to such counties; providing that the month of September shall not be paid until the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all of the reports required by him.

Sec. 3. The salaries of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than twenty-two thousand, six hundred (22,600) and not more than twenty-two thousand, eight hundred (22,800), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than Twenty-two Hundred Dollars ($2200) per annum and not more than Twenty-eight Hundred Dollars ($2800) per annum, and in counties having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, five hundred and fifty (14,550) and not more than fourteen thousand eight hundred (14,800), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than the sum of Twenty-two Hundred Dollars ($2200) and not more than Twenty-eight Hundred Dollars ($2800) per annum, to be fixed by the County Board of Education in each county.

Sec. 4. The salary of the Superintendent of Public Instruction of each county in Texas having a population of not less than eleven thousand and twenty-one (11,021), nor more than eleven thousand and fifty (11,050), according to the latest Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be not less than Twenty-one Hundred Dollars ($2100) per annum, nor more than Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400) per annum; said salary to be set by the County Board of School Trustees of each county affected.

Sec. 4-a. The salary shall be paid monthly upon the order of the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the month of September shall not be paid until the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all reports required by him.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 636.

Art. 2700d-28. SALARY AND EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF 197,000 TO 198,000 AND 32,400 TO 32,800 POPULATION; PRORATION OF ALLOWANCE; REPORTS.

Section 1. In all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than one hundred and ninety-seven thousand (197,000) and not more than one hundred and ninety-eight thousand (198,000) and all counties with a population of not less than thirty-two thousand, four hundred (32,400) and not more more than thirty-two thousand eight hundred (32,800), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be fixed by order of the County Board of Education in and for such counties at an amount not less than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) per year and not more than Four Thousand, Two Hundred Dollars ($4,200) per year and said salary shall be exclusive of any and all traveling expenses allowed by law.

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionment to the public free schools, the County Board of Education of each of the counties mentioned in Section 1 of this Act shall also make an annual allowance out of the State and County Available School Funds not exceeding the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) salary for traveling expenses incidental to and necessary in the administration of the county superintendent's office annually, and the same shall be prorated to the schools in said county in proportion to the scholastic population of each school district in each of said respective counties, and the Commissioners Court of said county may expend out of the General Fund of said counties not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300) per annum to defray the office expenses for stamps, stationery, telephone, etc., incidental to and necessary in the efficient administration of the schools of said counties respectively.

Sec. 3. The salary and traveling expenses provided for herein shall be paid monthly, upon the order of fhe County Board of Education; provided that the salary for the month of September shall not be paid until the said county superintendent submits a certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that all reports required have been made to the State Department of Education; that the office expenses provided herein shall be paid by the County Treasurer on the order of the Commissioners Court as said expenses may be incurred.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 649.

Art. 2700d-29. TRAVELLING EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF 22,500 TO 22,600 POPULATION. In all counties having a population of not less than twenty-two thousand, five hundred (22,500) and not more than twenty-two thousand, six hundred (22,600), according to the last preceding Federal Census or any subsequent Federal Census, the county board of school trustees shall make provisions for the traveling expenses of the county superintendent of public instruction, and shall make an allowance for such traveling expenses in the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum, and no more. The amount allowed herein shall be paid in twelve (12) monthly installments and in the same manner as the salary and maintenance of the office of county superintendents are now paid.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 654, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-30. SUPERINTENDENT'S SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 14,535 TO 14,555 POPULATION. In all counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than fourteen thousand, five hundred and thirty-five (14,535) and not more than fourteen thousand, five hundred and fifty-five (14,555) inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be not less than Eighteen Hundred Dollars ($1800) and not more than Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400) per annum, the amount of which salary shall be fixed by the order of the County Boards of Education for the respective counties; and the County Board of Education for each of the counties coming within this Act shall, by order entered in its Minutes, set the salary for its respective county.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 630, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-31. TRAVELLING AND OFFICE EXPENSES OF SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF 13,400 TO 13,500 AND 5,180 TO 5,190 POPULATION. In all counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, four hundred (13,400) and not more than thirteen thousand, five hundred (13,500), and in all counties having a population of not less than five thousand, one hundred and eighty (5,180) and not more than five thousand, one hundred and ninety (5,190), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Board of School Trustees may make provisions for the traveling and office expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, and may make an allowance for such traveling and office expenses not exceeding the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed herein shall be paid in twelve (12) monthly installments and in the same manner as the salary and maintenance of the office of County Superintendents are now paid.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 651, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-32. SALARY OF SUPERINTENDENT IN COUNTIES OF 23,880 TO 23,890 AND 6,000 TO 6,010 POPULATION. In all counties containing a population of not more than twenty-three thousand, eight hundred and ninety (23,890) and not less than twenty-three thousand, eight hundred and eighty (23,880) according to the Federal Census of 1930, and containing a scholastic population of not more than six thousand and ten (6,010) and not less than six thousand (6,000) according to the 1938-1939 Public School Directory of the State Department of Education, the County Superintendent of Schools shall receive from the Available School Fund of their respective counties an annual salary of not less than Two Thousand, Two Hundred Dollars ($2,200) nor more than Two Thousand, Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400), said salary to be fixed by the County Board of School Trustees of the respective counties.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 639, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-33. SALARY OF SUPERINTENDENT IN COUNTIES OF 43,125 TO 43,200 POPULATION.

Section 1. From and after the passage of this Act, in all counties of the State of Texas which had a population of not less than forty-three thousand, one hundred and twenty-five (43,125), and not more than forty-three thousand, two hundred (43,200), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Three Thousand, Two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($3,250) per annum, to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by a General Law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Sec. 2. All laws and part of laws either here referred to by article, title, or number, General or Special, in conflict herewith are hereby modified and limited to the extent that they are not to be controlling, but the specific provisions of this Act shall be controlling in the counties to which it is made applicable. The provisions of this Act are cumulative of the General Law on this subject, but where not otherwise modified hereby, such General Laws are made applicable.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 647.

Art. 2700d-34. SALARY IN COUNTIES OF 20,790 TO 20,825 .

Section 1. From and after the passage of this Act, in all counties of the State of Texas which had a population of not less than twenty thousand, seven hundred and ninety (20,790) and not more than twenty thousand, eight hundred and twenty-five (20,825), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400) per annum, to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by General Law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Sec. 2. All laws and parts of laws either here referred to by Article, Title, or Number, general or special, in conflict herewith are hereby modified and limited to the extent that they are not to be controlling, but the specific provisions of this Act shall be controlling in the counties to which it is made applicable. The provisions of this Act are cumulative of the General Law on this subject, but where not otherwise modified hereby, such General Laws are made applicable.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 635.

Art. 2700d-35. SALARY AND OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 10,360 TO 10,380 AND COUNTIES OF 10,399 TO 10,499.

Section 1. The salary of the Superintendent of Public Instruction in each county in Texas having a population of not less than ten thousand, three hundred and sixty (10,360) and not more than ten thousand, three hundred and eighty (10,380), and in each county having a population of not less than ten thousand, three hundred and ninety-nine (10,399) and not more than ten thousand, four hundred and ninety-nine (10,499) inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall from and after the passage of this Act be Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400) per annum.

Sec. 2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction in each county in Texas having a population of not less than ten thousand, three hundred and sixty (10,360) and not more than ten thousand, three hundred and eighty (10,380), and in each county having a population of not less than ten thousand, three hundred and ninety-nine (10,399) and not more than ten thousand, four hundred and ninety-nine (10,499) inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall be allowed office and traveling expenses not exceeding Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum, to be paid monthly out of the Available School Fund.

Sec. 3. The salary shall be paid monthly upon the order of the County School Trustees; provided that the month of September shall not be paid until the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have presented a receipt or certificate from the State Superintendent of Public Instruction showing that he has made all the reports required by him.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 628.

Art. 2700d-36. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES IN COUNTIES OF 24,578 TO 24,580 AND COUNTIES OF 64,400 TO 64,500. In counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand, five hundred and seventy-eight (24,578) and not more than twenty-four thousand, five hundred and eighty (24,580), and in counties having a population of not less than sixty-four thousand, four hundred (64,400) and not more than sixty-four thousand, five hundred (64,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the County Boards of Trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the County Superintendent.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 655, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-37. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT--SALARY AND EXPENSES--COMPENSATION OF SCHOOL TRUSTEES--COUNTIES OF 13,450 TO 13,600 AND 19,950 TO 20,100 POPULATION. In counties with a population according to the last preceding Federal Census of not less than thirteen thousand, four hundred and fifty (13,450) and not more than thirteen thousand, six hundred (13,600) and of not less then nineteen thousand, nine hundred and fifty (19,950) nor more than twenty thousand, one hundred (20,100), the salary of the county superintendent of public instruction shall be fixed by the Commissioners Court at not less than Eighteen Hundred Dollars ($1800), nor more than Twenty-two Hundred Dollars ($2200) per annum, and office and travelling expenses not exceeding Four Hundred Dollars ($400) per annum may be allowed, when necessarily incurred by the superintendent in the discharge of the duties of the office, out of the State and county available school funds, provided further, that the Commissioners Court may expend from the general fund of the county not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200) per annum for the purpose of supplementing the office expenses of the county superintendent of public instruction. The compensation of each county school trustee in such counties shall be Five Dollars ($5) per day, but not more than Sixty Dollars ($60) shall be paid any trustee in any one year, payment thereof to be made in the manner provided by existing law.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 629, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-38. SALARIES IN COUNTIES OF 34,600 TO 34,700 AND COUNTIES OF 13,800 TO 13,900.

Section 1. From and after the passage of this Act, in all counties of the State of Texas which had a population of not less than thirty-four thousand, six hundred (34,600) and not more than thirty-four thousand, seven hundred (34,700), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be set by the County Board of Trustees at an amount not to exceed Thirty-six Hundred Dollars ($3600) per annum and not less than Twenty-eight Hundred Dollars ($2800) per annum to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by a General Law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Sec. 1a. From and after the passage of this Act, in all counties of the State of Texas which had a population of not less than thirteen thousand, eight hundred (13,800) and not more than thirteen thousand, nine hundred (13,900), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be set by the County Board of Trustees at an amount not to exceed Twenty-two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($2250) and not less than Eighteen Hundred Dollars ($1800) and traveling and other expenses as now allowed by General Law to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by the General Law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 641.

Art. 2700d-39. SALARIES IN COUNTIES OF 77,000 TO 77,600; 51,770 TO 51,800; 12,190 TO 12,200; 13,400 TO 13,500; 27,500 TO 27,600. From and after the passage of this Act in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than seventy-seven thousand (77,000) and not more than seventy-seven thousand, six hundred (77,600), and in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than fifty-one thousand, seven hundred and seventy (51,770) and not more than fifty-one thousand, eight hundred (51,800), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Thirty-six Hundred Dollars ($3600) per annum; and in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than twelve thousand, one hundred and ninety (12,190) and not more than twelve thousand, two hundred (12,200), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000) per annum; and in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than thirteen thousand, four hundred (13,400) and not more than thirteen thousand, five hundred (13,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Twenty-eight Hundred Dollars ($2800) per annum; and in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than twenty-seven thousand, five hundred (27,500) and not more than twenty-seven thousand, six hundred (27,600), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400) per annum, to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by the general law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent, as provided in Article 2700, Revised Civil Statutes, 1925.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 648, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-40. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT--SALARIES--COUNTIES OF 23,620 TO 23,800 AND 12,460 TO 12,780 POPULATION.

Section 1. From and after the effective date of this Act, the salaries of county superintendents of public instruction in all counties in this State having a population of not less than twenty-three thousand, six hundred and twenty (23,620) nor more than twenty-three thousand, eight hundred (23,800), according to the last Federal Census, shall be in a sum not less than Twenty-two Hundred Dollars ($2200) and not more than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000). The salaries of county superintendents of public instruction in all counties in this State having a population of not less than twelve thousand, four hundred and sixty (12,460) and not more than twelve thousand seven hundred and eighty (12,780), according to the last preceding Federal Census, shall be in a sum not less than Eighteen Hundred Dollars ($1800) and not more than Twenty-four Hundred Dollars ($2400).

Sec. 2. In making the annual per capita apportionments in the schools of the counties coming within the provisions of this Act, the county school trustees shall provided for the payment of the salaries hereinabove named, to be paid monthly upon the order of the county school trustees, that is to say, the annual salaries shall be divided by twelve (12) and the amount determined by such division shall be paid monthly to such superintendents.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 638.

Art. 2700d-41. OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES OF COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT OR EX OFFICIO COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT IN COUNTIES OF 8,200 TO 8,500. In counties having a population of not less than eight thousand, two hundred (8,200) and not more than eight thousand, five hundred (8,500), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the county board of trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for office and traveling expenses of the county superintendent of public instruction or, if the county has no county superintendent, for the County Judge when acting as ex officio county superintendent of public instruction; provided that the amount of such expenditures for office and traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the county superintendent.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 396, ch. 229, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-42. TRAVELING EXPENSES OF EX OFFICIO COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT OR ASSISTANT IN COUNTIES OF 9,070 TO 9,200. In counties with a population of not less than nine thousand and seventy (9,070) nor more than nine thousand, two hundred (9,200), as shown by the Federal Census of 1940, the county board of trustees may make such provisions as they deem necessary for traveling expenses of the ex officio county superintendent or any assistant he may have, provided that the amount of the traveling expenses shall not exceed the sum of Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum. The amount of such expenses so allowed shall be paid in the manner and in accordance with now existing laws governing the maintenance of the office of the ex officio county superintendent.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 442, ch. 278, Sec. 1.

Art. 2700d-43. SALARY AND OFFICE AND TRAVELING EXPENSES OF COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT IN CERTAIN COUNTIES.

Section 1. From and after the passage of this Act in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than eighty-three thousand (83,000) and not more than eighty-four thousand (84,000); and in all those counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than twenty thousand, five hundred and sixty (20,560) and not more than twenty thousand, five hundred and seventy (20,570); and in all those counties having not less than twenty thousand, two hundred and thirty (20,230) and not more than twenty thousand, two hundred and fifty (20,250); and in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than thirteen thousand, three hundred and twelve (13,312) and not more than thirteen thousand, three hundred and fifteen (13,315); and in all those counties of the State of Texas having a population of not less than thirteen thousand, two hundred and thirty (13,230) and not more than thirteen thousand, two hundred and thirty-five (13,235), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the salary of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Thirty-six Hundred Dollars ($3600) per annum; to be paid in accordance with and in the manner as provided by the General Law governing the maintenance of the office of County Superintendent, as provided in Article 2700, Revised Civil Statutes, 1925.

Sec. 2. From and after the passage of this Act, in all counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than eighty-three thousand (83,000) and not more than eighty-four thousand (84,000); and in all those counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than twenty thousand, five hundred and sixty (20,560) and not more than twenty thousand, five hundred and seventy (20,570); and in all those counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than twenty thousand, two hundred and thirty (20,230) and not more than twenty thousand, two hundred and fifty (20,250); and in all those counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than thirteen thousand, three hundred and twelve (13,312) and not more than thirteen thousand, three hundred and fifteen (13,315); and in all those counties of the State of Texas which have a population of not less than thirteen thousand, two hundred and thirty (13,230) and not more than thirteen thousand, two hundred and thirty-five (13,235), according to the last preceding Federal Census, the amount which shall be allowed for office and travel expenditures for the County Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be Six Hundred Dollars ($600) per annum.

Sec. 3. All laws and parts of laws, whether here referred to by Article, Title, or number, or not, General or Special, in conflict herewith are hereby modified and limited to the extent that they are not to be controlling, but the specific provisions of this Act shall be controlling in the counties to which it is made applicable. The provisions of this Act are cumulative of the General Law on the subject, and where not otherwise modified hereby, such General Laws are made applicable.

Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 1410, ch. 643.

Art. 2700d-44. AUTOMOBILES FOR USE OF COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS IN COUNTIES OF 500,000 OR MORE.

Section 1. In all counties in this State having a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or more according to the last preceding Federal Census, or any future Federal Census, the County School Trustees may provide for the purchase and maintenance of an automobile for the use of the County Superintendent. In lieu of providing for the purchase and maintenance of such automobile, the County School Trustees may, in their discretion, allow to the County Superintendent out of the County equalization fund such sum of money per month as will in their judgment cover the cost of an automobile and the expenses of maintaining it, including depreciation thereon, provided that such sum so fixed shall not exceed the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100) per month. Such allowance, when fixed by the County School Trustees, shall be paid monthly from the County equalization fund. Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed as authorizing any increase in any tax rate now in effect in any such counties.

Sec. 2. The County Superintendent shall make monthly reports showing the kind of automobile operated by him, the number of miles such car was operated during the month in the discharge of the duties of his office, the amounts expended by him in the maintenance thereof, and such other information as may be required of him by the County School Trustees. All such reports shall be audited, and shall be subject to the approval of the County Auditor of such counties, if there be a County Auditor.

Sec. 3. The allowance above provided for shall be continued in effect for such period of time as may be determined by the County School Trustees, and may be changed from time to time as in their judgment the facts and circumstances require. Such allowance shall be in addition to the expenses now authorized by law for County Superintendents.

Sec. 4. The provisions of Article 2700, Vernon's Annotated Civil Statutes, as amended by Acts 1941, Forty-seventh Legislature, Page 407, and Acts 1943, Forty-eighth Legislature, Page 697, shall apply to all counties of the class above enumerated. The provisions of such laws shall be cumulative of all other laws governing such counties.

Acts 1945, 49th Leg., p. 169, ch. 126.

Art. 2700e. SALARIES OF ASSISTANTS IN COUNTIES OF 13,700 TO 13,800; 29,000 TO 30,000 AND 46,000 TO 47,000. In counties having a population of more than 13,700 and less than 13,800 inhabitants, or a population of more than 29,000 and less than 30,000 inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, and in counties having a population of more than 46,000 and less than 47,000 inhabitants, according to the last preceding Federal Census, the first assistant to the county superintendent of public instruction is entitled to receive an annual salary of not more than $5,500; however, the aggregate salaries of all assistants to the county superintendent may not exceed $8,800 a year.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 1016, ch. 500, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1965.

Art. 2701a. RURAL SUPERVISOR, DUTIES, SALARY, ETC.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of not less than 31,000 nor more than 31,789, according to the Federal Census of 1920, and a scholastic population of not less than 9,300 as shown by the scholastic report for the school year of 1928-29, may employ a Rural School Supervisor to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county.

Sec. 2. The Rural Supervisor provided for in this Act shall be the holder of a teacher's permanent certificate (not permanent primary) and shall have had four years successful experience as a teacher in the primary and intermediate grades and in addition shall have had practice teaching in said grades.

Sec. 3. It shall be the duty of such Supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them; suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 4. The Supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, either by the Supervisor or the County Board, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings, whenever possible.

Sec. 5. The salary of the Rural School Supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such Supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $2,000. Said salary shall be paid out of the local or available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary, or salaries, of the teachers of the districts.

Sec. 6. The employment of a Rural School Supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a Teachers' Institute for rural teachers, including teachers of independent districts of fewer than five hundred scholastics, and exempt the rural teachers of the county from attendance upon a Teachers' Institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 469, ch. 219.

Art. 2701b. RURAL SUPERVISOR IN CERTAIN COUNTIES.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of 30,000 to 30,500 and a population of 34,300 to 34,500 according to the Federal census of 1920, may employ a rural school supervisor or supervisors to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them; suggesting methods of prescribing the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the supervisor, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $1,800.00. Said salary shall be paid out of the local or available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary, or salaries, of the teachers of the district or may be apportioned out of the State and County apportionment.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural school supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teachers' institute for rural teachers, and teachers of Independent districts of less than 10,000 population and exempt such teachers from attendance upon a teachers' institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., p. 526, ch. 251.

Art. 2701c. RURAL SCHOOL SUPERVISOR IN LIEU OF TEACHERS' INSTITUTE.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of 37,000 to 37,800, according to the Federal census of 1920, and a scholastic population of at least 10,000 as shown by the scholastic report for the school year 1927-28, may employ a Rural School Supervisor to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such Supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them, suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The Supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the Supervisor, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the Rural School Supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such Supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $1,800.00. Said salary shall be paid out of the available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary, or salaries, of the teachers of the district.

Sec. 5. The employment of a Rural School Supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a Teachers' Institute for rural teachers and exempt the rural teachers of the county from attendance upon a Teachers' Institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., 1st C.S., p. 188, ch. 74.

Art. 2701d. RURAL SUPERVISOR AND SALARY IN COUNTIES HAVING POPULATION OF 1,100 TO 41,500.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of 1,100 to 41,500 according to the last Federal census, and a scholastic population of at least 9200 as shown by the scholastic report for the preceding school year may employ a rural school supervisor or supervisors to plan, outline and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county. Such supervisor to have college degree or other appropriate evidence of proficiency in rural supervision.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and to help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them; suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the supervisor, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $2,000.00. Said salary shall be paid out of the local or available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary, or salaries, of the teachers of the district or may be apportioned out of the State and County apportionment.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural school supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teacher's institute for rural teachers, and teachers of Independent districts of less than 10,000 population and exempt such teachers from attendance upon a teachers' institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1929, 41st Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 242, ch. 9.

Art. 2701d-1. RURAL SUPERVISOR AND SALARY IN COUNTIES HAVING POPULATION OF 30,000 TO 30,500.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of 30,000 to 30,500 according to the Federal census of 1920 may employ a rural school supervisor or supervisors to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them; suggesting methods of prescribing the work and aiding them in other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the supervisor, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $1,800. Said salary shall be paid out of the local or available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary or salaries of the teachers of the districts, or may be apportioned out of the State and county apportionment. Provided, also, that any expense necessary in carrying on the work of said supervisors shall be paid by the County Board of School Trustees in the same manner and from the same funds as the salary of said supervisors.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural school supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teachers' institute for rural teachers, and teachers of independent districts of less than 10,000 population and exempt such teachers from attendance upon a teachers' institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of 1925 and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1930, 41st Leg., 5th C.S., p. 166, ch. 32.

Art. 2701d-2. SUPERVISOR AND SALARY IN COUNTIES HAVING POPULATION OF 28,000 TO 28,327.

Section 1. That the County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of 28,000 to 28,327 according to the last Federal census, and a scholastic population of at least 8,349, as shown by the scholastic report for the preceding school year may employ a rural school supervisor to plan, outline and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county. Such supervisor to have college degree.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them; suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisor may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the supervisor, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such supervisor for any one year shall not exceed $2,000. Said salary shall be paid out of the local or available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary or salaries, of the teachers of the district or may be apportioned out of the State and County apportionment.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural school supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teachers' institute for rural teachers and teachers of Independent districts of less than 10,000 population and exempt such teachers from attendance upon a teachers' institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1930, 41st Leg., 5th C.S., p. 195, ch. 53.

Art. 2701d-2a. RURAL SCHOOL SUPERVISORS.

Section 1. The County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of twenty-nine thousand, three hundred (29,300) to twenty-nine thousand, five hundred (29,500) and forty-six thousand, one hundred (46,100) to forty-six thousand two hundred (46,200), according to the last available Federal Census, may employ a rural school supervisor to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county, and shall meet with and advise with the County Board at all regular meetings.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their classwork by teaching demonstration lessons for them, suggesting methods of presenting the work, and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisor may call the meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of the teachers to attend all such meetings called by the supervisor whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees; provided that the total salary paid such supervisor for any one year shall not exceed One Thousand, Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500). Said salary shall be paid out of the available funds of the districts in proportion to the weekly salary or salaries of the teachers of the district.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural school supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teachers' institute for rural teachers; and in all counties having a population of twenty-nine thousand, three hundred (29,300) to twenty-nine thousand, five hundred (29,500), according to the last available Federal Census, shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a teachers' institute for teachers of independent districts with a scholastic population of less than five hundred (500); and shall exempt the teachers of such schools of the county from attendance upon a teachers' institute, as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas of 1925, and as amended by the Fortieth Legislature.

Acts 1927, 40th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 249, ch. 91; Acts 1929, 41st Leg., 1st C.S., p. 194, ch. 77; Acts 1930, 41st Leg., 4th C.S., p. 74, ch. 36; Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., Spec.L., p. 343, ch. 164; Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 73, ch. 42; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 710, Sec. 1.

Art. 2701d-4. SUPERVISOR, SALARY AND DUTIES IN COUNTIES HAVING POPULATION OF 49,100 TO 51,500.

Section 1. That the County Board of County Trustees in co-operation with the County Superintendent in counties having a population of forty-nine thousand, one hundred (49,100) to fifty-one thousand, five hundred (51,500) according to the last Federal Census and scholastic population of twelve thousand, seven hundred and seventy-seven (12,777) as shown by the scholastic reports for the preceding school year, may employ one or two rural school supervisors to plan, outline and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the county. Such supervisors to have appropriate evidence of proficiency in rural supervision.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor or supervisors to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their class work, by teaching demonstration lessons for them, suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any way possible.

Sec. 3. The supervisors in cooperation with the County Superintendent, may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duty of such teachers to attend all such meetings, whenever possible.

Sec. 4. The salary of such rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of County Trustees and the County Superintendent, provided that the total salary paid each such supervisor shall not exceed two thousand, four hundred dollars ($2,400.00) for any one year, including traveling expenses. The said salary shall be paid out of the State available funds apportioned to the said county each scholastic year.

Sec. 5. The employment of a rural supervisor under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding teachers' institutes for rural teachers and teachers of independent districts of the county and shall exempt the teachers from attendance upon a teachers' institute as provided in Article 2691, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas, of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 557, ch. 181.

Art. 2701d-5. RURAL SCHOOL SUPERVISORS IN VAN ZANDT AND OTHER COUNTIES.

Section 1. COUNTIES TO WHICH APPLICABLE. The County Boards of School Trustees may employ rural supervisors of Van Zandt, Panola, Nacogdoches, Jasper, Cass, Live Oak, Anderson, Scurry, Wood, Denton, Shelby, Morris, Parker, Nolan, Titus, Wise and Lamar Counties, to plan, outline, and supervise the work of the primary and intermediate grades of the rural schools of the counties.

Sec. 2. VISITING SCHOOLS. It shall be the duty of such supervisors to visit the schools of the counties and help the teachers with their class work by teaching demonstration lessons for them: suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding them in any other ways possible.

Sec. 3. TEACHERS' MEETINGS. The supervisors may call meetings of the teachers when deemed necessary, either by the supervisors or the County Boards, for the purpose of discussing their work with them, and it shall be the duties of the teachers to attend all such meetings whenever possible.

Sec. 4. SALARY. The salary of the rural school supervisor shall be determined by the County Board of School Trustees, providing that the total salaries paid such school supervisor for any one year shall not exceed Two Thousand ($2,000.00) Dollars; said salary shall be included in the annual budget for County Administration Expense, and an assessment shall be levied upon the scholastic population of Van Zandt County for the purpose of paying the salary of the supervisor, provided the County Board of School Trustees of the various counties named in House Bill No. 72, Chapter 39, of the General and Special Laws of the Forty-second Legislature, First Called Session, 1931, shall have the power to discontinue the office of rural school supervisors at any time when it is clearly shown that such rural school supervisors are not a public necessity, and their services are not commensurate with the salaries received.

Sec. 5. EXEMPTIONS; PARTIAL INVALIDITY. The employment of rural school supervisors, under the terms of this Act shall exempt the County Superintendent from holding a Teachers' Institute for rural teachers, including teachers of independent districts of fewer than five hundred (500) scholastics, and exempt the rural teachers of the County from attendance upon a Teachers' Institute as provided for in Article 2691, Revised Statutes of 1925, and as amended by the 40th Legislature.

It is hereby declared that if any clause, phrase, provision or section of this bill should be invalid or unconstitutional, that the Legislature would have nevertheless passed the remaining portions of said bill without including the phrase, clause, provision or section so declared invalid or unconstitutional.

Acts 1931, 42nd Leg., 1st C.S., p. 83, ch. 39; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 713, Sec. 1; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 714, Sec. 1; Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 715, Sec. 1.

Art. 2701e-1. RURAL SCHOOL MUSIC SUPERVISOR IN COUNTIES OF 16,670 TO 17,060 AND 9,300 TO 9,405 POPULATION.

Section 1. The County Board of School Trustees in counties having a population of not less than sixteen thousand, six hundred and seventy (16,670) nor more than seventeen thousand and sixty (17,060) and all counties having a population of not more than nine thousand, four hundred and five (9,405) and not less than nine thousand, three hundred (9,300), according to the last preceding Federal Census, may employ, upon the recommendation of the County Superintendent, a rural school music supervisor to plan, outline, supervise, and teach music in the rural schools which are under the supervision and administration of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction, said supervisor at all times to work in cooperation with and under the supervision of the County Superintendent of Public Instruction. Such supervisor must have evidence of proficiency in public school music and be able to direct same. Other qualifications to be set up by County Superintendent.

Sec. 2. It shall be the duty of such supervisor to visit the schools of the county and help the teachers with their classwork, in music by teaching demonstration lessons for them, suggesting methods of presenting the work and aiding in every possible way to improve classroom instruction in music. The supervisor, in cooperation with the County Superintendent, may call meetings of the teachers of the county when deemed necessary for the purpose of discussing with them their problems, and it shall be the duty of said teachers to attend such meetings whenever called. Said supervisor, when not visiting schools, shall render assistance in the office of the County Superintendent of whatever nature may be necessary if demanded by the County Superintendent.

Sec. 3. The removal of such supervisor and the termination of his or her services shall at all times be under the control of the Board of County School Trustees acting on the recommendation of the County Superintendent of said county.

Sec. 4. The salary of such rural school music supervisor shall be determined by the Board of County School Trustees and the County Superintendent; provided the total salary of said supervisor shall not exceed One Thousand, Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500) per annum, the salary of said supervisor to be allowed each year out of the County Available Fund.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., Spec.L., p. 718.